District of Columbia statutes.
46-351.05

Application of chapter to resident of foreign country and foreign support proceeding.

(a)

A tribunal of the District shall apply subchapters I through VI of this chapter [§§ 46-351.01 through § 46-356.16] and, as applicable, subchapter VII of this chapter [§ 46-357.01 et seq.], to a support proceeding involving:

(1)

A foreign support order;

(2)

A foreign tribunal; or

(3)

An obligee, obligor, or child residing in a foreign country.

(b)

A tribunal of the District that is requested to recognize and enforce a support order on the basis of comity may apply the procedural and substantive provisions of subchapters I through VI of this chapter [§§ 46-351.01 through § 46-356.16].

(c)

Subchapter VII of this chapter [§ 46-357.01 et seq.] applies only to a support proceeding under the Convention. In such a proceeding, if a provision of subchapter VII of this chapter [§ 46-357.01 et seq.] is inconsistent with subchapters I through VI of this chapter [§§ 46-351.01 through § 46-356.16], subchapter VII [§ 46-357.01 et seq.] controls.

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 105, 63 DCR 222